California, session 20252026, AB1913.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12528 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:12528. (a) An employee of, or a volunteer registered with, a law enforcement agency, as defined in Section 830.1 or 830.2 of the Penal Code, shall be permitted to operate emergency equipment pursuant to this section.(b) In order to operate emergency equipment as defined in this section, an employee or volunteer described in subdivision (a) shall complete training that includes all of the following:(1) A classroom portion of at least 16 hours taught by an instructor who meets or exceeds the standards adopted by the law enforcement agency described in subdivision (a) for the operation of emergency equipment.(2) A driver training portion of at least 14 hours that includes directly-supervised behind-the-wheel training by an instructor approved by the law enforcement agency described in subdivision (a) and who possesses a minimum of five years of experience as an emergency vehicle operator.(3) A written emergency equipment operation examination.(c) Instructors for the training program shall meet both of the following requirements:(1) Possess a valid California class A or class B license, or, alternatively, a class C license, having completed the emergency equipment operation training described in this section, and possessing at least five years of experience operating emergency equipment as defined in this section.(2) Be certified as a qualified training instructor or training officer by the State of California, the federal government, or a county training officers’ association.(d) A training program participant shall possess a valid California class C license. (e)For purposes of this section, “emergency equipment” means a motor vehicle operated under a class A or class B driver’s license pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12804.9 of the Vehicle Code that is used to travel to and from the scene of an emergency situation, to and from a place where the emergency equipment is repaired or repositioned, or to transport equipment used in the control of an emergency situation and that is owned, leased, rented by, or under the exclusive control of a law enforcement agency described in Section 830.1 or 830.2 of the Penal Code.(e) (1) For purposes of this section, “emergency equipment” means a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles that meets the definition of a class A or class B vehicle described in subdivision (b) of Section 12804.9, subject to the following limitations:(A) The motor vehicle shall not exceed 45 feet in length and the towed vehicle, if applicable, shall not exceed 30,000 pounds gross vehicle weight or gross vehicle weight rating, whichever is greater.(B) The motor vehicle or combination of vehicles shall be used to travel to and from the scene of an emergency situation, to and from a place where the emergency equipment is repaired or repositioned, or to transport equipment used in the control of an emergency situation and that is owned, leased, rented by, or under the exclusive control of a law enforcement agency described in Section 830.1 or 830.2 of the Penal Code.(2) For purposes of this section, an authorized emergency vehicle that has been issued a license by the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol to operate in response to emergency calls is not “emergency equipment.”(3) Vehicles operated pursuant to this section are not exempt from the provisions of Division 15 (commencing with Section 35000).SEC. 2. Section 12804.9 of the Vehicle Code, as amended by Section 3 of Chapter 16 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:12804.9. (a) (1) The examination shall include all of the following:(A) A test of the applicant’s knowledge and understanding of the provisions of this code governing the operation of vehicles upon the highways.(B) A test of the applicant’s ability to read and understand simple English used in highway traffic and directional signs.(C) A test of the applicant’s understanding of traffic signs and signals, including the bikeway signs, markers, and traffic control devices established by the Department of Transportation.(D) An actual demonstration of the applicant’s ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in operating a motor vehicle by driving it under the supervision of an examining officer. The applicant shall submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive, except that the department may waive the driving test part of the examination for any applicant who submits a license issued by another state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico if the department verifies through any acknowledged national driver record data source that there are no stops, holds, or other impediments to its issuance. The examining officer may request to see evidence of financial responsibility for the vehicle before supervising the demonstration of the applicant’s ability to operate the vehicle. The examining officer may refuse to examine an applicant who is unable to provide proof of financial responsibility for the vehicle, unless proof of financial responsibility is not required by this code.(E) A test of the hearing and eyesight of the applicant, and of other matters that may be necessary to determine the mental and physical fitness of the applicant to operate a motor vehicle upon the highways, and whether any grounds exist for refusal of a license under this code.(2) (A) Before a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, may be issued or renewed, the applicant shall have in the applicant’s driver record a valid report of a medical examination of the applicant given not more than two years before the date of the application by a health care professional. As used in this paragraph, “health care professional” means a person who is licensed, certified, or registered in accordance with applicable state laws and regulations to practice medicine and perform physical examinations in the United States. Health care professionals are doctors of medicine, doctors of osteopathy, physician assistants, and registered advanced practice nurses, or doctors of chiropractic who are clinically competent to perform the medical examination presently required of motor carrier drivers by the United States Department of Transportation. The report shall be on a form approved by the department. In establishing the requirements, consideration may be given to the standards presently required of motor carrier drivers by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.(B) The department may accept a federal waiver of one or more physical qualification standards if the waiver is accompanied by a report of a nonqualifying medical examination for a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, pursuant to Section 391.41(a)(3)(ii) of Subpart E of Part 391 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(3) A physical defect of the applicant that, in the opinion of the department, is compensated for to ensure safe driving ability, shall not prevent the issuance of a license to the applicant.(b) In accordance with the following classifications, an applicant for a driver’s license shall be required to submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive:(1) Class A includes the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a combination of vehicles, if a vehicle being towed has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds.(B) A vehicle towing more than one vehicle.(C) A trailer bus.(D) The operation of all vehicles under class B and class C.(2) Class B includes the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds.(B) A single vehicle with three or more axles, except any three-axle vehicle weighing less than 6,000 pounds.(C) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds, except a trailer bus.(D) A farm labor vehicle.(E) A single vehicle with three or more axles or a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.(F) A house car over 40 feet in length, excluding safety devices and safety bumpers.(G) The operation of all vehicles covered under class C.(3) Class C includes the following:(A) A two-axle vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, including when the vehicle is towing a trailer or semitrailer with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a trailer coach not exceeding 9,000 pounds gross.(C) A house car of 40 feet in length or less.(D) A three-axle vehicle weighing 6,000 pounds gross or less.(E) A house car of 40 feet in length or less or a vehicle towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less, including when a tow dolly is used. A person driving a vehicle may not tow another vehicle in violation of Section 21715.(F) (i) A two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing either a trailer coach or a fifth-wheel travel trailer not exceeding 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating, when the towing of the trailer is not for compensation.(ii) A two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a fifth-wheel travel trailer exceeding 10,000 pounds, but not exceeding 15,000 pounds, gross vehicle weight rating, when the towing of the trailer is not for compensation, and if the person has passed a specialized written examination provided by the department relating to the knowledge of this code and other safety aspects governing the towing of recreational vehicles upon the highway.(iii) The authority to operate combinations of vehicles under this subparagraph may be granted by endorsement on a class C license upon completion of that written examination.(G) A vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross combination weight rating or a gross vehicle weight rating, as those terms are defined in subdivisions (j) and (k), respectively, of Section 15210, of 26,000 pounds or less, if all of the following conditions are met:(i) Is operated by a farmer, an employee of a farmer, or an instructor credentialed in agriculture as part of an instructional program in agriculture at the high school, community college, or university level.(ii) Is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations.(iii) Is not used in the capacity of a for-hire carrier or for compensation.(H) Firefighting equipment, provided that the equipment is operated by a person who holds a firefighter endorsement pursuant to Section 12804.11.(I) A motorized scooter.(J) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, except a trailer bus.(K) Class C does not include a two-wheel motorcycle or a two-wheel motor-driven cycle.(L) Emergency equipment, provided the equipment is operated by a person who has completed the emergency equipment training described in Section 12528. “Emergency equipment” has the same meaning as that term is defined by Section 12528.(4) Class M1. A two-wheel motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle. Authority to operate a vehicle included in a class M1 license may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination.(5) (A) Class M2 includes a motorized bicycle or moped, or a bicycle with an attached motor, except an electric bicycle as described in subdivision (a) of Section 312.5.(B) Authority to operate vehicles included in class M2 may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination. Persons holding a class M1 license or endorsement may operate vehicles included in class M2 without further examination.(c) A driver’s license or driver certificate is not valid for operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, any other motor vehicle listed in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), or any other vehicle requiring a driver to hold any driver certificate or any driver’s license endorsement under Section 15275, unless a medical certificate approved by the department that has been issued within two years of the date of the operation of that vehicle and a copy of the medical examination report from which the certificate was issued is on file with the department. Otherwise, the license is valid only for operating class C vehicles that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, and for operating class M1 or M2 vehicles, if so endorsed, that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210.(d) A license or driver certificate issued before the enactment of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15200) is valid to operate the class or type of vehicles specified under the law in existence before that enactment until the license or certificate expires or is otherwise suspended, revoked, or canceled. Upon application for renewal or replacement of a driver’s license, endorsement, or certificate required to operate a commercial motor vehicle, a valid medical certificate on a form approved by the department shall be submitted to the department.(e) The department may accept a certificate of driving skill that is issued by an employer, authorized by the department to issue a certificate under Section 15250, of the applicant, in lieu of a driving test, on class A or B applications, if the applicant has first qualified for a class C license and has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The certificate may be submitted as evidence of the applicant’s skill in the operation of the types of equipment covered by the license for which the applicant is applying.(f) The department may accept a certificate of competence in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, when the certificate is issued by a law enforcement agency for its officers who operate class M1 or M2 vehicles in their duties, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying.(g) The department may accept a certificate of satisfactory completion of a motorcyclist training program approved by the commissioner pursuant to Section 2932 in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The department shall review and approve the written and driving test used by a program to determine whether the program may issue a certificate of completion.(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person holding a valid California driver’s license of any class may operate a short-term rental motorized bicycle without taking any special examination for the operation of a motorized bicycle, and without having a class M2 endorsement on that license. As used in this subdivision, “short-term” means 48 hours or less.(i) A person under 21 years of age shall not be issued a class M1 or M2 license or endorsement unless the person provides evidence satisfactory to the department of completion of a novice motorcycle safety training program that is operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.(j) A driver of a vanpool vehicle may operate with a class C license but shall possess evidence of a medical examination required for a class B license when operating vanpool vehicles. In order to be eligible to drive the vanpool vehicle, the driver shall keep in the vanpool vehicle a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the driver has not been convicted of reckless driving, drunk driving, or a hit-and-run offense in the last five years.(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 12804.9 of the Vehicle Code, as amended by Section 4 of Chapter 16 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:12804.9. (a) (1) The examination shall include all of the following:(A) A test of the applicant’s knowledge and understanding of the provisions of this code governing the operation of vehicles upon the highways.(B) A test of the applicant’s ability to read and understand simple English used in highway traffic and directional signs.(C) A test of the applicant’s understanding of traffic signs and signals, including the bikeway signs, markers, and traffic control devices established by the Department of Transportation.(D) An actual demonstration of the applicant’s ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in operating a motor vehicle by driving it under the supervision of an examining officer. The applicant shall submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive, except that the department may waive the driving test part of the examination for any applicant who submits a license issued by another state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico if the department verifies through any acknowledged national driver record data source that there are no stops, holds, or other impediments to its issuance. The examining officer may request to see evidence of financial responsibility for the vehicle before supervising the demonstration of the applicant’s ability to operate the vehicle. The examining officer may refuse to examine an applicant who is unable to provide proof of financial responsibility for the vehicle, unless proof of financial responsibility is not required by this code.(E) A test of the hearing and eyesight of the applicant, and of other matters that may be necessary to determine the mental and physical fitness of the applicant to operate a motor vehicle upon the highways, and whether any grounds exist for refusal of a license under this code.(2) (A) Before a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, may be issued or renewed, the applicant shall have in the applicant’s driver record a valid report of a medical examination of the applicant given not more than two years before the date of the application by a health care professional. As used in this paragraph, “health care professional” means a person who is licensed, certified, or registered in accordance with applicable state laws and regulations to practice medicine and perform physical examinations in the United States. Health care professionals are doctors of medicine, doctors of osteopathy, physician assistants, and registered advanced practice nurses, or doctors of chiropractic who are clinically competent to perform the medical examination presently required of motor carrier drivers by the United States Department of Transportation. The report shall be on a form approved by the department. In establishing the requirements, consideration may be given to the standards presently required of motor carrier drivers by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.(B) The department may accept a federal waiver of one or more physical qualification standards if the waiver is accompanied by a report of a nonqualifying medical examination for a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, pursuant to Section 391.41(a)(3)(ii) of Subpart E of Part 391 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(3) A physical defect of the applicant that, in the opinion of the department, is compensated for to ensure safe driving ability, shall not prevent the issuance of a license to the applicant.(b) In accordance with the following classifications, an applicant for a driver’s license shall be required to submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive:(1) Class A includes the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a combination of vehicles, if a vehicle being towed has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds.(B) A vehicle towing more than one vehicle.(C) A trailer bus.(D) The operation of all vehicles under class B and class C.(2) Class B includes the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds.(B) A single vehicle with three or more axles, except any three-axle vehicle weighing less than 6,000 pounds.(C) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds, except a trailer bus.(D) A farm labor vehicle.(E) A single vehicle with three or more axles or a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.(F) A house car over 40 feet in length, excluding safety devices and safety bumpers.(G) The operation of all vehicles covered under class C.(3) Class C includes the following:(A) A two-axle vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, including when the vehicle is towing a trailer or semitrailer with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a trailer coach not exceeding 9,000 pounds gross.(C) A house car of 40 feet in length or less.(D) A three-axle vehicle weighing 6,000 pounds gross or less.(E) A house car of 40 feet in length or less or a vehicle towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less, including when a tow dolly is used. A person driving a vehicle may not tow another vehicle in violation of Section 21715.(F) (i) A two-axle vehicle when towing a trailer exceeding 10,000 pounds, but not exceeding 15,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight, if all of the following conditions are met:(I) The towing of the trailer is not for compensation or commercial purposes.(II) The trailer is coupled to the towing vehicle by a bed-mounted gooseneck hitch or a fifth-wheel and kingpin connection.(III) The trailer is used exclusively for recreational purposes.(IV) The trailer is used for the transportation of property or human habitation, or both.(V) The person has passed a specialized written examination provided by the department relating to the knowledge of this code and other safety aspects governing the towing of recreational vehicles upon the highway.(ii) A vehicle towing a fifth-wheel travel trailer exceeding 10,000 pounds, but not exceeding 15,000 pounds, gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight, when the towing of the trailer is not for compensation, and if the person has passed a specialized written examination provided by the department relating to the knowledge of this code and other safety aspects governing the towing of recreational vehicles upon the highway.(iii) The authority to operate combinations of vehicles under this subparagraph may be granted by endorsement on a class C license upon completion of that written examination.(G) A vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross combination weight rating or a gross vehicle weight rating, as those terms are defined in subdivisions (j) and (k), respectively, of Section 15210, of 26,000 pounds or less, if all of the following conditions are met:(i) Is operated by a farmer, an employee of a farmer, or an instructor credentialed in agriculture as part of an instructional program in agriculture at the high school, community college, or university level.(ii) Is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations.(iii) Is not used in the capacity of a for-hire carrier or for compensation.(H) Firefighting equipment, provided that the equipment is operated by a person who holds a firefighter endorsement pursuant to Section 12804.11.(I) A motorized scooter.(J) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, except a trailer bus.(K) Class C does not include a two-wheel motorcycle or a two-wheel motor-driven cycle.(L) Emergency equipment, provided the equipment is operated by a person who has completed the emergency equipment training described in Section 12528. “Emergency equipment” has the same meaning as that term is defined by Section 12528.(4) Class M1. A two-wheel motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle. Authority to operate a vehicle included in a class M1 license may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination.(5) (A) Class M2 includes a motorized bicycle or moped, or a bicycle with an attached motor, except an electric bicycle as described in subdivision (a) of Section 312.5.(B) Authority to operate vehicles included in class M2 may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination. Persons holding a class M1 license or endorsement may operate vehicles included in class M2 without further examination.(c) A driver’s license or driver certificate is not valid for operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, any other motor vehicle listed in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), or any other vehicle requiring a driver to hold any driver certificate or any driver’s license endorsement under Section 15275, unless a medical certificate approved by the department that has been issued within two years of the date of the operation of that vehicle and a copy of the medical examination report from which the certificate was issued is on file with the department. Otherwise, the license is valid only for operating class C vehicles that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, and for operating class M1 or M2 vehicles, if so endorsed, that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210.(d) A license or driver certificate issued before the enactment of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15200) is valid to operate the class or type of vehicles specified under the law in existence before that enactment until the license or certificate expires or is otherwise suspended, revoked, or canceled. Upon application for renewal or replacement of a driver’s license, endorsement, or certificate required to operate a commercial motor vehicle, a valid medical certificate on a form approved by the department shall be submitted to the department.(e) The department may accept a certificate of driving skill that is issued by an employer, authorized by the department to issue a certificate under Section 15250, of the applicant, in lieu of a driving test, on class A or B applications, if the applicant has first qualified for a class C license and has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The certificate may be submitted as evidence of the applicant’s skill in the operation of the types of equipment covered by the license for which the applicant is applying.(f) The department may accept a certificate of competence in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, when the certificate is issued by a law enforcement agency for its officers who operate class M1 or M2 vehicles in their duties, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying.(g) The department may accept a certificate of satisfactory completion of a motorcyclist training program approved by the commissioner pursuant to Section 2932 in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The department shall review and approve the written and driving test used by a program to determine whether the program may issue a certificate of completion.(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person holding a valid California driver’s license of any class may operate a short-term rental motorized bicycle without taking any special examination for the operation of a motorized bicycle, and without having a class M2 endorsement on that license. As used in this subdivision, “short-term” means 48 hours or less.(i) A person under 21 years of age shall not be issued a class M1 or M2 license or endorsement unless the person provides evidence satisfactory to the department of completion of a novice motorcycle safety training program that is operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.(j) A driver of a vanpool vehicle may operate with a class C license but shall possess evidence of a medical examination required for a class B license when operating vanpool vehicles. In order to be eligible to drive the vanpool vehicle, the driver shall keep in the vanpool vehicle a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the driver has not been convicted of reckless driving, drunk driving, or a hit-and-run offense in the last five years.(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.